test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VVW_ikwe_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niikweenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niikweensimishinaanibaning
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niikweensimishinaanibanan
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niikweensimishinaanibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niikweensimishiniibaning
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niikweensimishiniibanan
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niikweensimishiniibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niikweensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niikweensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niikweensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niikweensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niikweensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niikweensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giikweenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giikweenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giikweenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giikweenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giikweenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giikweenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giikweenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giikweenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giikweenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giikweenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giikweensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giikweensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giikweensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giikweensimishiniibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giikweensimishiniibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giikweensimishiniibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giikweensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giikweensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giikweensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giikweensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giikweensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giikweensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oikweenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oikweenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oikweenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oikweenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oikweenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oikweenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oikweenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oikweenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oikweenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oikweenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oikweensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oikweensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oikweensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oikweensimishiniibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oikweensimishiniibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oikweensimishiniibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oikweensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oikweensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oikweensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oikweensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oikweensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oikweensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iikweenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iikweenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iikweenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iikweenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iikweenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iikweenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iikweenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iikweenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iikweenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iikweenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iikweenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iikweenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iikweenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iikweensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iikweensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iikweensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iikweensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iikweensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iikweensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iikweensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iikweensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iikweensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iikweensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iikweensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iikweensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iikweensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iikweensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
